Florida, session 2026, SB1442.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 109 110 Section 1.âSection 216.013, Florida Statutes, is amended to 111 read: 112 216.013âLong-range program plans plan.âState agencies and 113 the judicial branch shall develop long-range program plans to 114 achieve state goals and objectives using an interagency planning 115 process that includes the development of integrated agency 116 program service outcomes. The plans of state agencies must shall 117 be policy based on statutorily established policies;, priority 118 driven by priorities and outcomes to achieve state goals, 119 objectives, and policies;, accountable;, and developed through 120 careful examination and justification of all agency and judicial 121 branch programs and activities. The plans of the judicial branch 122 must be policy based, including consideration of any statutory 123 policy; driven by priorities and outcomes to achieve state 124 goals, objectives, and policies; accountable; and developed 125 through careful examination and justification of all judicial 126 branch programs and activities. 127 (1)âLong-range program plans must shall provide the 128 framework for the development of legislative budget requests. 129 (2)âLong-range program plans must and shall identify or 130 update: 131 (a)âThe mission of the agency or judicial branch. 132 (b)âThe performance measures required pursuant to s. 133 216.1827 goals established to accomplish the mission. 134 (c)âThe objectives developed to achieve state goals. 135 (d)âThe trends and conditions relevant to the mission, the 136 performance measures, and the state goals, and objectives. 137 (d)(e)âThe state agency or judicial branch programs that 138 will be used to implement statutorily established state policy, 139 or the judicial branch programs that will be used to implement 140 state policy, and achieve state goals and objectives. 141 (f)âThe program outcomes and standards to measure progress 142 toward program objectives. 143 (g)âInformation regarding performance measurement, which 144 includes, but is not limited to, how data is collected, the 145 methodology used to measure a performance indicator, the 146 validity and reliability of a measure, the appropriateness of a 147 measure, and whether, in the case of agencies, the agency 148 inspector general has assessed the reliability and validity of 149 agency performance measures, pursuant to s. 20.055(2). 150 (h)âLegislatively approved output and outcome performance 151 measures. Each performance measure must identify the associated 152 activity contributing to the measure from those identified in 153 accordance with s. 216.023(4)(b). 154 (i)âPerformance standards for each performance measure and 155 justification for the standards and the sources of data to be 156 used for measurement. Performance standards must include 157 standards for each affected activity and be expressed in terms 158 of the associated unit of activity. 159 (j)âPrior-year performance data on approved performance 160 measures and an explanation of deviation from expected 161 performance. Performance data must be assessed for reliability 162 in accordance with s. 20.055. 163 (k)âProposed performance incentives and disincentives. 164 (3)(a)1.âLong-range program plans must include information 165 about the implementation status of any law enacted in the 166 previous legislative session. The implementation status must be 167 provided until all provisions of the law related to the agency 168 have been fully implemented. 169 2.âFor purposes of initial implementation of this 170 subsection, in addition to laws enacted pursuant to the 2026 171 Regular Session, an agency must also provide information on 172 recently enacted laws for the 2024 and 2025 Regular Sessions 173 which have provisions not fully implemented. This subparagraph 174 expires on June 30, 2027. 175 (b)âImplementation status information must include, at a 176 minimum, all of the following: 177 1.âActions or steps taken to implement the law, and actions 178 or steps planned for implementation, including, but not limited 179 to, all of the following, as applicable: 180 a.âAdministrative rules proposed for implementation. 181 b.âProcurements required. 182 c.âContracts executed to assist the agency in 183 implementation. 184 d.âContracts executed to implement or administer the law. 185 e.âPrograms started, offices established, or other 186 organizational administrative changes made, including personnel 187 changes. 188 f.âFederal waivers requested. 189 2.âThe status of any required appointments and all 190 scheduled board, commission, or related public meetings. 191 3.âA description of the agency programs, outputs, and 192 activities implemented or changed related to the law. 193 4.âAll expenditures made that were directly related to the 194 implementation. 195 5.âAny provisions remaining to be implemented. 196 6.âA description of any impediment or delay in the 197 implementation, including, but not limited to, challenges of 198 administrative rules or identification of any policy issue that 199 needs to be resolved by the Legislature to ensure timely and 200 effective implementation. 201 7.âInformation related to any litigation related to the law 202 which is not provided under subparagraph 6. 203 8.âAny performance measure developed and the specific data 204 identified, including data regarding enrollments, participants, 205 loans, and other data elements of programs, outputs, and 206 activities. 207 (4)(2)âEach Long-range program plans must plan shall cover 208 a period of 5 fiscal years, be revised annually, and remain in 209 effect until replaced or adjusted as provided in this section 210 revised. 211 (5)(3)âLong-range program plans or revisions must shall be 212 presented by state agencies and the judicial branch in a form, 213 manner, and timeframe prescribed in written instructions 214 prepared by the Executive Office of the Governor in consultation 215 with the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees. 216 (6)(4)âEach state executive agency and the judicial branch 217 shall post their long-range program plans on their Internet 218 websites not later than September 30 30th of each year, and 219 provide written notice to the Governor and the Legislature that 220 the plans have been posted. 221 (7)(5)âEach state agency The state agencies and the 222 judicial branch shall make appropriate adjustments to their 223 long-range program plans, excluding adjustments to performance 224 measures, outcomes, and standards, to be consistent with the 225 appropriations in the General Appropriations Act, and 226 legislation implementing the General Appropriations Act, and 227 other enacted legislation. Agencies and the judicial branch have 228 30 days subsequent to the effective date of the General 229 Appropriations Act and implementing legislation to make 230 adjustments to their plans as posted on their Internet websites. 231 (8)âAnnually, no later than September 15, each state agency 232 and the judicial branch shall submit their long-range program 233 plans to the Legislative Budget Commission for approval, 234 including any update on meeting their plansâ approved 235 performance measures and any deviation from expected performance 236 measures. 237 (9)âIf the chairs of the legislative appropriations 238 committees notify a state agency or the judicial branch that the 239 agency or the judicial branch has failed to comply with this 240 section or s. 216.1827, the agency or the judicial branch may 241 not submit amendments or otherwise make changes to its approved 242 budget for operations and fixed capital outlay pursuant to s. 243 216.181 until the agency or the judicial branch has corrected 244 its deficiency. 245 (10)(6)âLong-range program plans developed pursuant to this 246 chapter are not rules and, therefore, are not subject to the 247 provisions of chapter 120. 248 (7)âNotwithstanding the provisions of this section, each 249 state executive agency and the judicial branch are not required 250 to develop or post a long-range program plan by September 30, 251 2025, for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, except in circumstances 252 outlined in any updated written instructions prepared by the 253 Executive Office of the Governor in consultation with the chairs 254 of the legislative appropriations committees. This subsection 255 expires July 1, 2026. 256 Section 2.âSection 216.1827, Florida Statutes, is amended 257 to read: 258 216.1827âRequirements for performance measures, outcomes, 259 and standards.â 260 (1)âEach state agency Agencies and the judicial branch 261 shall maintain a comprehensive performance accountability system 262 containing, at a minimum, a list of performance measures, 263 outcomes, and standards as required by that are adopted by the 264 Legislature and subsequently amended pursuant to this section. 265 (2)âEach state agency shall adopt the following performance 266 measures, outcomes, and standards: 267 (a)âAdministrative costs as a percentage of total agency 268 costs, including salaries and benefits and excluding fixed 269 capital outlay. 270 (b)âPercentage of vacant positions filled within 180 days 271 after becoming vacant. 272 (c)âTotal dollar amount of salary increases awarded, 273 delineated by the subtotal dollar amount of the increases 274 specifically authorized in the General Appropriations Act or 275 other law and the subtotal dollar amount of the increases 276 awarded without specific legislative authorization. 277 (d)âPercentage of corrective actions taken within 6 months 278 after receipt of audit findings and management letters issued to 279 resolve such findings or letters from financial and operational 280 audits conducted pursuant to s. 11.45. 281 (e)âPrivate attorney service costs dollar amounts, by case 282 and as a percentage of total agency legal costs; legal costs 283 paid to the Attorney Generalâs office, by case and as a 284 percentage of total agency legal costs; and total agency legal 285 costs as a percentage of total agency budget. 286 (f)âTotal dollar amount of expenditures by state term 287 contract as defined in s. 287.012, contracts procured using 288 alternative purchasing methods as authorized pursuant to s. 289 287.042(16), and agency procurements through request for 290 proposal, invitation to negotiate, invitation to bid, single 291 source, and emergency purchases. 292 (g)âIf applicable, the number of complete applications 293 received and the average number of days to complete a permit, 294 licensure, registration, or certification process, from the date 295 of the receipt of initial application to final agency action, 296 for each permit, license, registration, or certification issued 297 by the agency or judicial branch. 298 (h)âIf applicable, the total number of required 299 inspections, total number of inspections completed, and 300 percentage of required inspections completed. 301 (i)âIf applicable, the average number of calendar days to 302 award and contract for noncompetitive projects or grant programs 303 for state or federal funds from the date of receipt of funds by 304 the agency or receipt of budget authority, whichever is later. 305 (3)âIn addition to the performance measures, outcomes, and 306 standards required by subsection (2), each agency shall develop 307 and adopt at least five additional performance measures, 308 outcomes, and standards. Additional performance measures, 309 outcomes, and standards must include key state agency functions. 310 When developing the additional performance measures, outcomes, 311 and standards, each state agency shall take all of the following 312 into consideration: 313 (a)âThe mission of the agency, state goals and objectives, 314 and statutory policy. 315 (b)âPrograms, outputs, and activities that are key agency 316 functions. 317 (c)âSelection of data elements that best and most 318 accurately measure progress toward state goals and objectives, 319 including facilitating analysis of any deviation from expected 320 performance. 321 (4)âThe judicial branch shall adopt performance measures, 322 outcomes, and standards established by the Supreme Court, which 323 must be substantially similar to the measures, outcomes, and 324 standards in subsection (2) and the considerations outlined in 325 subsection (3). 326 (5)âEach state agency and the judicial branch shall 327 maintain the justification for each performance measure, 328 outcome, or standard, and the sources of data to be used. 329 (6)(2)(a)âEach state agency Agencies and the judicial 330 branch shall submit long-range program plans with performance 331 measures in the form, manner, and timeframe output and outcome 332 measures and standards, as well as historical baseline and 333 performance data pursuant to s. 216.013. The long-range program 334 plan must provide: 335 (a)âInformation regarding measurement of the performance 336 measures, including how the data is collected, baseline data, 337 the methodology used for measurement, the reason for the 338 measurement, and the validity and reliability of the 339 measurement; and 340 (b)âData for the previous 5 years related to the 341 performance measures, outcomes, and standards and an explanation 342 of deviation from expected performance. 343 (7)âEach state agency Agencies and the judicial branch 344 shall also submit performance data, measures, outcomes, and 345 standards, including any information required by this section, 346 to the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government 347 Accountability upon request for review of the adequacy of the 348 legislatively approved measures and standards. 349 (8)âFor each state agency and the judicial branch, 350 performance measures, outcomes, and standards, including any 351 amendments thereto, must be adopted by the Legislative Budget 352 Commission. 353 (3)(a)âAt least 30 days before the scheduled annual 354 legislative session, a state an agency or the Chief Justice of 355 the Supreme Court may submit requests to delete or amend its 356 existing approved performance measures, outcomes, and standards 357 or activities, including alignment of activities to performance 358 measures, or submit requests to create additional performance 359 measures, outcomes, and standards or activities to the 360 Legislature Executive Office of the Governor for review and 361 approval. The request must shall document the justification for 362 the change and ensure that the revision, deletion, amendment, or 363 addition is consistent with legislative intent. Such deletion, 364 amendment, or addition is subject to review and approval by the 365 Legislative Budget Commission Revisions or deletions to or 366 additions of performance measures and standards approved by the 367 Executive Office of the Governor are subject to the review and 368 objection procedure set forth in s. 216.177. 369 (b)âEach state agency and the judicial branch shall make 370 appropriate adjustments to their performance measures, outcomes, 371 and standards to be consistent with the appropriations in the 372 General Appropriations Act, legislation implementing the General 373 Appropriations Act, and other enacted legislation. State 374 agencies and the judicial branch have 30 days after the 375 effective date of the General Appropriations Act or other 376 enacted legislation to propose adjustments to their plans for 377 review and approval by the Legislative Budget Commission The 378 Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may submit deletions or 379 amendments of the judicial branchâs existing approved 380 performance measures and standards or may submit additional 381 performance measures and standards to the Legislature 382 accompanied with justification for the change and ensure that 383 the revision, deletion, or addition is consistent with 384 legislative intent. Revisions or deletions to, or additions of 385 performance measures and standards submitted by the Chief 386 Justice of the Supreme Court are subject to the review and 387 objection procedure set forth in s. 216.177. 388 (4)(a)âThe Legislature may create, amend, and delete 389 performance measures and standards. The Legislature may confer 390 with the Executive Office of the Governor for state agencies and 391 the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court for the judicial branch 392 prior to any such action. 393 (b)âThe Legislature may require state agencies to submit 394 requests for revisions, additions, or deletions to approved 395 performance measures and standards to the Executive Office of 396 the Governor for review and approval, subject to the review and 397 objection procedure set forth in s. 216.177. 398 (c)âThe Legislature may require the judicial branch to 399 submit revisions, additions, or deletions to approved 400 performance measures and standards to the Legislature, subject 401 to the review and objection procedure set forth in s. 216.177. 402 (d)âAny new state agency created by the Legislature shall 403 establish is subject to the initial performance measures, 404 outcomes, and standards thereof, subject to review and approval 405 by the Legislative Budget Commission established by the 406 Legislature. The Legislature may require state agencies and the 407 judicial branch to provide any information necessary to create 408 initial performance measures and standards. 409 (d)âEach state agency and the judicial branch shall submit 410 new performance measures, outcomes, and standards, including the 411 information required by this section, to the Legislative Budget 412 Commission by December 1, 2026. This paragraph expires on 413 December 31, 2027. 414 Section 3.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of 415 section 20.055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 416 20.055âAgency inspectors general.â 417 (2)âAn office of inspector general is established in each 418 state agency to provide a central point for coordination of and 419 responsibility for activities that promote accountability, 420 integrity, and efficiency in government. It is the duty and 421 responsibility of each inspector general, with respect to the 422 state agency in which the office is established, to: 423 (a)âAdvise in the development of performance measures, 424 outcomes, standards, and procedures for the evaluation of state 425 agency programs. 426 (b)âAssess the reliability and validity of the information 427 provided by the state agency on performance measures and 428 standards, and make recommendations for improvement, if 429 necessary, before submission of such information pursuant to s. 430 216.1827. 431 Section 4.âSection 186.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to 432 read: 433 186.021âLong-range program plans.âPursuant to s. 216.013, 434 each state agency shall develop a long-range program plan on an 435 annual basis. The plan must shall provide the framework and 436 context for designing and interpreting the agency budget 437 request. The plan must will be developed through careful 438 examination and justification of agency functions and their 439 associated costs. An agency shall use the long-range program 440 plan It shall be used by the agency to implement the stateâs 441 goals and objectives. The agency shall also develop performance 442 measures, outcomes, and standards to measure programs, outputs, 443 Indicators shall be developed to measure service and activity 444 performance. 445 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 446 420.0003, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 447 420.0003âState housing strategy.â 448 (3)âIMPLEMENTATION.âThe state, in carrying out the strategy 449 articulated in this section, shall have the following duties: 450 (b)âThe long-range program plan of the corporation 451 department must include specific performance measures, goals, 452 and objectives, and strategies that implement the housing 453 policies in this section. 454 Section 6.âSection 420.511, Florida Statutes, is amended to 455 read: 456 420.511âStrategic business plan; long-range program plan; 457 annual report; audited financial statements.â 458 (1)âThe corporation shall develop a strategic business plan 459 for the provision of affordable housing for the state. The plan 460 must be consistent with the long-range program plan prepared 461 pursuant to subsection (2) and must shall contain performance 462 measures and specific performance targets for the following: 463 (a)âThe ability of low-income and moderate-income 464 Floridians to access housing that is decent and affordable. 465 (b)âThe continued availability and affordability of housing 466 financed by the corporation to target populations. 467 (c)âThe availability of affordable financing programs, 468 including equity and debt products, and programs that reduce 469 gaps in conventional financing in order to increase individual 470 access to housing and stimulate private production of affordable 471 housing. 472 (d)âThe establishment and maintenance of efficiencies in 473 the delivery of affordable housing. 474 (e)âSuch other measures as directed by the corporationâs 475 board of directors. 476 (2)âThe corporation, in coordination with the department, 477 shall annually develop a long-range program plan for the 478 provision of affordable housing in this state as required 479 pursuant to chapter 186. In part, the plan must include 480 provisions that maximize the abilities of the corporation to 481 implement the state housing strategy established under s. 482 420.0003, to respond to federal housing initiatives, and to 483 develop programs in a manner that is more responsive to the 484 needs of public and private partners. The plan must shall be 485 developed on a schedule consistent with that established by s. 486 186.021. For purposes of this section, the Secretary of Commerce 487 or his or her designee shall serve as the corporationâs 488 representative to achieve a coordinated and integrated planning 489 relationship with the department. 490 (3)âThe corporation shall submit to the Governor and the 491 presiding officers of each house of the Legislature, within 6 492 months after the end of its fiscal year, a complete and detailed 493 report setting forth the corporationâs state and federal program 494 accomplishments using the most recent available data. The report 495 must include, but is not limited to: 496 (a)âThe following tenant characteristics in the existing 497 rental units financed through corporation-administered programs: 498 1.âThe number of households served, delineated by income, 499 race, ethnicity, and age of the head of household. 500 2.âThe number of households served in large, medium, and 501 small counties as described in s. 420.5087(1) and the extent to 502 which geographic distribution has been achieved in accordance 503 with s. 420.5087. 504 3.âThe number of farmworker and commercial fishing worker 505 households served. 506 4.âThe number of homeless households served. 507 5.âThe number of special needs households served. 508 6.âBy county, the average rent charged based on unit size. 509 (b)âThe number of rental units to which resources have been 510 allocated in the last fiscal year, including income and 511 demographic restrictions. 512 (c)âThe estimated average cost of producing units under 513 each rental or homeownership unit financed under each program in 514 the last fiscal year. 515 (d)âBy county, the average sales price of homeownership 516 units financed in the last fiscal year. 517 (e)âThe number of households served by homeownership 518 programs in the last fiscal year, including the income, race, 519 ethnicity, and age of the homeowner of each household. 520 (f)âThe percentage of homeownership loans that are in 521 foreclosure. 522 (g)âThe percentage of properties in the corporationâs 523 rental portfolio which have an occupancy rate below 90 percent. 524 (h)âThe amount of economic stimulus created by the 525 affordable housing finance programs administered by the 526 corporation for the most recent year available. 527 (i)âFor the State Apartment Incentive Loan Program (SAIL), 528 a comprehensive list of all closed loans outstanding at the end 529 of the most recent fiscal year, including, but not limited to, 530 development name, city, county, developer, set-aside type, set 531 aside percentage, affordability term, total number of units, 532 number of set-aside units, lien position, original loan amount, 533 loan maturity date, loan balance at close of year, status of 534 loan, rate of interest, and interest paid. 535 (j)âFor the Florida Affordable Housing Guarantee Program, a 536 list of all guaranteed loans through the close of the most 537 recent fiscal year, including, but not limited to, development 538 name, city, county, developer, total number of units, issuer of 539 the bonds, loan maturity date, participation in the United 540 States Department of Housing and Urban Development Risk-Sharing 541 Program, original guarantee amount, guarantee amount at the 542 close of the fiscal year, status of guaranteed loans, and total 543 outstanding Florida Housing Finance Corporation Affordable 544 Housing Guarantee Program revenue bonds at the close of the most 545 recent fiscal year. 546 (k)âAny other information the corporation deems 547 appropriate. 548 (4)âWithin 6 months after the end of its fiscal year, the 549 corporation shall submit audited financial statements, prepared 550 in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, 551 which include all assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenses of 552 the corporation, and a list of all bonds outstanding at the end 553 of its fiscal year. The audit must be conducted by an 554 independent certified public accountant, performed in accordance 555 with generally accepted auditing standards and government 556 auditing standards, and incorporate all reports, including 557 compliance reports, as required by such auditing standards. 558 (5)âThe Auditor General shall conduct an operational audit 559 of the accounts and records of the corporation and provide a 560 written report on the audit to the President of the Senate and 561 the Speaker of the House of Representatives by December 1, 2016. 562 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 563 made by this act to section 216.013, Florida Statutes, in a 564 reference thereto, paragraph (ee) of subsection (1) of section 565 216.011, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 566 216.011âDefinitions.â 567 (1)âFor the purpose of fiscal affairs of the state, 568 appropriations acts, legislative budgets, and approved budgets, 569 each of the following terms has the meaning indicated: 570 (ee)ââLong-range program planâ means a plan developed 571 pursuant to s. 216.013. 572 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 573 made by this act to section 216.013, Florida Statutes, in a 574 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (5) of section 575 402.56, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 576 402.56âChildrenâs cabinet; organization; responsibilities; 577 annual report.â 578 (5)âDUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES.âThe Children and Youth 579 Cabinet shall: 580 (d)âDesign and implement actions that will promote 581 collaboration, creativity, increased efficiency, information 582 sharing, and improved service delivery between and within state 583 governmental organizations that provide services for children 584 and youth and their families. In particular, the efforts shall 585 include the long-range planning process mandated by s. 216.013. 586 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.